Hawaii statutes.
§436B-20 Suspended license. No
license shall be suspended by the licensing authority for a period exceeding
five years. A person whose license has been suspended may apply for
reinstatement of the license to the extent authorized by law and upon complete
compliance with any term or condition imposed by the order of suspension. The
application for reinstatement shall be accompanied by all applicable fees,
including but not limited to reinstatement fees, any compliance resolution fund
fees, and any recovery fund assessments. [L 1991, c 111, pt of §2; am L 1992, c
202, §17; am L 1993, c 109, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next